Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB673.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Alien" means any person who is not a citizen or national of the United States,
as described in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1101 et seq., as amended;
(2) "Business entity":
(a) Means any person or group of persons that employs one (1) or more persons
performing or engaging in any activity, enterprise, profession, or
occupation for gain, benefit, advantage, or livelihood, whether for profit or
not for profit; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to:
1. A self-employed individual, business entity filing articles of
incorporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
company, foreign corporation, foreign limited partnership, foreign
limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state,
business trusts, and any business entity that registers with the
Secretary of State; and
2. Any business entity that possesses a business license, permit,
certificate, approval, registration, charter, or similar form of
authorization issued by the state, any business entity that is exempt by
law from obtaining such a business license, and any business entity
that is operating unlawfully without a business license;
(3) "Contractor":
(a) Means a person, employer, or business entity that enters into an agreement
to perform any service or work or to provide a certain product in exchange
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
for valuable consideration; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to a general contractor, subcontractor,
independent contractor, contract employee, project manager, or a recruiting
or staffing entity;
(4) "Employee":
(a) Means any person directed, allowed, or permitted to perform labor or
service of any kind by an employer, except that employees of an independent
contractor working for a business entity shall not be regarded as the
employees of the business entity for the purposes of Sections 1 to 3 and 4 of
this Act; and
(b) Does not include any inmate in the legal custody of the state, a county, or a
municipality;
(5) "Employer":
(a) Means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, joint stock association,
agent, manager, representative, foreman, or other person having control or
custody of any employment, place of employment, or of any employee,
including any person or entity employing any person for hire within the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, including a public employer; and
(b) Does not include the occupant of a household contracting with another
person to perform casual domestic labor within the household;
(6) "Employment":
(a) Means the act of employing or state of being employed, engaged, or hired to
perform work or service of any kind or character within the Commonwealth
of Kentucky, including any job, task, work, labor, personal services, or any
other activity for which compensation is provided, expected, or due;
(b) Includes but is not limited to all activities conducted by a business entity or
employer; and
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
(c) Does not include:
1. Casual domestic labor performed in a household on behalf of the
occupant of the household; or
2. The relationship between a contractor and the employees of a
subcontractor performing work for the contractor;
(7) "E-Verify" or "E-Verify Program" means the electronic verification of federal
employment authorization program of the Illegal Immigration Reform and
Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-208, in U.S.C. sec.
1324(a), as amended, and operated by the United States Department of Homeland
Security, or a successor program.
(8) "Federal work authorization program" means any of the electronic verification
of work authorization programs operated by the United States Department of
Homeland Security, or an equivalent federal work authorization program
operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security to verify
information of newly hired employees, under the Immigration Reform and
Control Act of 1986, Pub. L .No. 99-603, as amended, or the Illegal Immigration
Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-208, as
amended, in U.S.C. sec. 1324(a);
(9) "Knows" or "knowingly" means a person acts knowingly or with knowledge with
respect to either:
(a) The person's conduct or to attendant circumstances when the person is
aware of the nature of the person's conduct or that those circumstances
exist; or
(b) A result of the person's conduct when the person is reasonably aware that
the person's conduct is likely to cause that result;
(10) "Policy or practice" means a guiding principle or rule that may be written or
adopted through repeated actions or customs;
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
(11) "Public employer" means every department, agency, or instrumentality of the
state or a political subdivision of the state, including every department, agency, or
instrumentality of cities, counties, urban-county governments, charter county
governments, consolidated local governments, unified local governments, and
special districts;
(12) "State-funded entity":
(a) Means any governmental entity of the state or a political subdivision thereof
or any other entity that receives any moneys from the state or a political
subdivision thereof; and
(b) Does not include an entity that only provides a service or a product to any
governmental entity of the state or a political subdivision thereof, and
receives compensation for the same;
(13) "Subcontractor" means a person, business entity, or employer who is awarded a
portion of an existing contract by a contractor, regardless of its tier; and
(14) "Unauthorized alien" means an alien who is not authorized to work in the United
States as defined in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1324a(h)(3).
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A business entity, employer, or public employer shall not knowingly employ, hire
for employment, or continue to employ an unauthorized alien to perform work
within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. As used in this subsection, "knowingly
employ, hire for employment, or continue to employ an unauthorized alien"
means the actions described in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1324a.
(2) Every business entity or employer in this state shall enroll in E-Verify and
thereafter verify the employment eligibility of the employee through E-Verify in
accordance with the federal statutes and regulations governing the E-Verify
Program. A business entity or employer that uses E-Verify to determine the work
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
authorization of an employee shall not be deemed to have violated this section
with respect to the employment of that employee.
(3) On a finding of a first violation by a court of competent jurisdiction that a
business entity or employer knowingly violated subsection (1) of this section, the
court shall do all of the following:
(a) Order the business entity or employer to terminate the employment of every
unauthorized alien;
(b) Subject the business entity or employer to a three (3) year probationary
period throughout the state. During the probationary period, the business
entity or employer shall file quarterly reports with the local county attorney
specifying each new employee who is hired by the business entity or
employer in the state;
(c) Order the business entity or employer to file a signed, sworn affidavit with
the local county attorney within three (3) days after the order is issued by
the court stating that the business entity or employer has terminated the
employment of every unauthorized alien and the business entity or employer
will not knowingly or intentionally employ an unauthorized alien in this
state; and
(d) Direct the applicable state, county, or municipal governing bodies to
suspend all existing business licenses and permits of the business entity or
employer for a period not to exceed ten (10) business days specific to the
business location where the unauthorized alien performed work.
(4) Before a business license or permit that has been suspended under subsection
(3)(d) of this section is reinstated, a legal representative of the business entity or
employer shall submit to the court:
(a) A signed, sworn affidavit stating that the business entity or employer is in
compliance with subsection (1) of this section; and
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
(b) A copy of the memorandum of understanding issued to the business entity
or employer at the time of enrollment in E-Verify.
(5) The suspension of a business license or permit under subsection (3)(d) of this
section shall terminate one (1) business day after a legal representative of the
business entity or employer submits a signed, sworn affidavit to the court, stating
that the business entity or employer is in compliance with subsection (1) of this
section.
(6) For a second violation of subsection (1) of this section by a business entity or
employer, the court shall direct the applicable state, county, or municipal
governing body to permanently revoke all existing business licenses and permits,
held by the business entity or employer specific to the business location where the
unauthorized alien performed work. On receipt of the order, and notwithstanding
any other law, the appropriate agencies shall immediately revoke the licenses and
permits held by the business entity or employer.
(7) For a subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section, the court shall direct
the applicable governing bodies to forever suspend all existing business licenses
and permits of the business entity or employer throughout the state.
(8) This section shall not be construed to deny any procedural mechanisms or legal
defenses included in the E-Verify Program or any other federal work
authorization program. A person or entity that establishes that it has complied in
good faith with the requirements of 8 U.S.C. sec. 1324a(b) establishes an
affirmative defense that the business entity or employer did not knowingly hire or
employ an unauthorized alien.
(9) In proceedings of the court, the determination of whether an employee is an
unauthorized alien shall be made by the federal government pursuant to 8 U.S.C.
sec. 1373(c). The court shall consider only the federal government's
determination when deciding whether an employee is an unauthorized alien. The
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
court may take judicial notice of any verification of an individual's immigration
status previously provided by the federal government and may request the federal
government to provide further automated or testimonial verification.
(10) Any business entity or employer that terminates an employee to comply with this
section shall not be liable for any claims made against the business entity or
employer by the terminated employee, provided that the termination is made
without regard to the race, ethnicity, or national origin of the employee and is
consistent with the antidiscrimination laws of this state and the United States.
(11) (a) In addition to the county attorneys of this state, the Attorney General shall
also have authority to bring a civil complaint in any court of competent
jurisdiction to enforce the requirements of this section.
(b) Any resident of this state may petition the Attorney General to bring an
enforcement action against a specific business entity or employer by means
of a written, signed petition. A valid petition shall include an allegation that
describes the alleged violator or violators, as well as the action constituting
the violation, and the date and location where the action occurred.
(c) A petition that alleges a violation on the basis of national origin, ethnicity,
or race shall be deemed invalid and shall not be acted upon.
(d) The Attorney General shall respond to any petition under this subsection
within sixty (60) days of receiving the petition, either by filing a civil
complaint in a court of competent jurisdiction or by informing the petitioner
in writing that the Attorney General has determined that filing a civil
complaint is not warranted.
(12) This section shall not apply to the relationship between a party and the employees
of an independent contractor performing work for the party and does not apply to
casual domestic labor performed within a household.
(13) (a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1) of this section
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
that a business entity or employer was entrapped.
(b) To claim entrapment, the business entity or employer shall admit by
testimony or other evidence the substantial elements of the violation.
(c) A business entity or employer who asserts an entrapment defense has the
burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the following:
1. The idea of committing the violation started with law enforcement
officers or their agents rather than with the business entity or
employer;
2. The law enforcement officers or their agents urged and induced the
business entity or employer to commit the violation; and
3. The business entity or employer was not already predisposed to
commit the violation before the law enforcement officers or their
agents urged and induced the employer to commit the violation.
(14) In addition to actions taken by the state or political subdivisions thereof, the
Attorney General or the county attorney may bring an action to enforce the
requirements of this section in any District Court of a county in which the
business entity or employer does business.
(15) The terms of this section shall be interpreted consistently with 8 U.S.C. sec. 1324a
and any applicable federal rules and regulations.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall establish and maintain an E-
Verify employer agent service for any business entity or employer in this state
with twenty-five (25) or fewer employees to use the E-Verify Program to verify an
employee's employment eligibility on behalf of the business entity or employer.
(2) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall:
(a) Establish an E-Verify employer agent account with the United States
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
Department of Homeland Security;
(b) Enroll a participating business entity or employer in the E-Verify Program
on its behalf; and
(c) Conform to all federal statutes and regulations governing E-Verify
employer agents.
(3) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall not charge a fee to a
participating business entity or employer for the E-Verify employer agent service.
(4) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security's E-Verify employer agent service
shall accommodate a business entity or employer who wishes to communicate
with the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security by internet, by electronic mail, by
facsimile machine, by telephone, or in person, provided that the communication
is consistent with federal statutes and regulations governing E-Verify employer
agents.
(5) Before receiving any contract, grant, or incentive by the state, any political
subdivision thereof, or any state-funded entity, a business entity or employer shall
provide proof to the state, political subdivision thereof, or state-funded entity that
the business entity or employer is enrolled and is participating in the E-Verify
Program, either independently or through the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Security's E-Verify employer agent service.
(6) Every three (3) months, the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall request
from the United States Department of Homeland Security a list of every business
entity or employer in this state that is enrolled in the E-Verify Program. On
receipt of the list, the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall make the list
available on its website.
(7) A business entity or employer that is enrolled in the E-Verify Program, verifies
the employment eligibility of an employee in good faith pursuant to this section,
and acts in conformity with all applicable federal statutes and regulations is
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
immune from liability under Kentucky law for any action by an employee for
wrongful discharge or retaliation based on a notification from the E-Verify
Program that the employee is an unauthorized alien.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 45A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) The following terms have the same meanings as in Section 1 of this Act:
1. "Alien";
2. "Business entity";
3. "Contractor";
4. "Employee";
5. "Employer";
6. "Employment";
7. "E-Verify" or "E-Verify Program";
8. "Federal work authorization program";
9. "Knows" or "knowingly";
10. "Policy or practice";
11. "State-funded entity";
12. "Subcontractor"; and
13. "Unauthorized alien"; and
(b) "Contract" means a contract awarded by the state, any political subdivision
thereof, or any state-funded entity that was competitively bid.
(2) As a condition for the award of any contract, grant, or incentive by the state, any
political subdivision thereof, or any state-funded entity to a business entity or
employer that employs one (1) or more employees, the business entity or employer
shall not knowingly employ, hire for employment, or continue to employ an
unauthorized alien within the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
(3) As a condition for the award of any contract, grant, or incentive by the state, any
political subdivision thereof, or any state-funded entity to a business entity or
employer that employs one (1) or more employees within the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, the business entity or employer shall provide documentation
establishing that the business entity or employer is enrolled in the E-Verify
Program. During the performance of the contract, the business entity or employer
shall participate in the E-Verify Program and shall verify every employee that is
required to be verified according to the applicable federal rules and regulations.
(4) Any subcontractor on a project paid for by contract, grant, or incentive by the
state, any political subdivision thereof, or any state-funded entity shall not
knowingly employ, hire for employment, or continue to employ an unauthorized
alien within the Commonwealth of Kentucky and shall also enroll in the E-Verify
Program prior to performing any work on the project. Furthermore, during the
performance of the contract, the subcontractor shall participate in the E-Verify
Program and shall verify every employee that is required to be verified according
to the applicable federal rules and regulations. This subsection shall only apply to
subcontractors performing work on a project subject to this section and not to
collateral persons or business entities hired by the subcontractor.
(5) A contractor of any tier shall not be liable under this section when the contractor
contracts with its direct subcontractor who violates subsection (4) of this section
unless it is shown that the contractor knew or should have known that the direct
subcontractor was in violation of subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction of a first violation of
subsection (2) of this section by any business entity or employer, including a
subcontractor:
(a) The business entity or employer shall be deemed in breach of contract and
the state, political subdivision thereof, or state-funded entity may terminate
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
the contract after providing notice and an opportunity to be heard;
(b) The court shall do all of the following:
1. Order the business entity or employer to terminate the employment of
every unauthorized alien;
2. Subject the business entity or employer to a three (3) year
probationary period throughout the state. During the probationary
period, the business entity or employer shall file quarterly reports with
the Finance and Administration Cabinet of each new employee who is
hired by the business entity or employer in the state; and
3. Order the business entity or employer to file, subject to the penalty of
perjury, a signed, sworn affidavit with the Finance and Administration
Cabinet within three (3) days after the order is issued by the court
stating that the business entity or employer has terminated the
employment of every unauthorized alien and the business entity or
employer will not knowingly or intentionally employ an unauthorized
alien in this state;
(c) If the court determines that the business entity or employer has a policy or
practice that violates this section, the court shall direct the applicable state,
county, or municipal governing bodies to suspend the business licenses or
permits of the business entity or employer for a period not to exceed sixty
(60) days specific to the location or locations where the unauthorized alien
performed work; and
(d) Before a business license or permit that has been suspended under
paragraph (c) of this subsection is reinstated, a legal representative of the
business entity or employer shall submit to the court a signed, sworn
affidavit stating that the business entity or employer is in compliance with
subsection (2) of this section and a copy of the Memorandum of
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
Understanding issued to the business entity or employer at the time of
enrollment in E-Verify.
(7) Upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction of a second violation of
subsection (2) of this section by a business entity or employer, including a
subcontractor, awarded a contract by the state, any political subdivision thereof,
or any state-funded entity that occurs within ten (10) years of a finding by a court
of competent jurisdiction of a first violation by the business entity or employer:
(a) The business entity or employer shall be deemed in breach of contract and
the state, political subdivision thereof, or state-funded entity shall terminate
the contract after providing notice and an opportunity to be heard;
(b) The court shall do all of the following:
1. Order the business entity or employer to terminate the employment of
every unauthorized alien;
2. Subject the business entity or employer to a five (5) year probationary
period throughout the state. During the probationary period, the
business entity or employer shall file quarterly reports with the
Finance and Administration Cabinet specifying each new employee
who is hired by the business entity or employer in the state; and
3. Order the business entity or employer to file, subject to the penalty of
perjury, a signed, sworn affidavit with the Finance and Administration
Cabinet within three (3) days after the order is issued by the court
stating that the business entity or employer has terminated the
employment of every unauthorized alien and the business entity or
employer will not knowingly or intentionally employ an unauthorized
alien in this state;
(c) If the court determines that the business entity or employer has a policy or
practice that violates this section, the court shall direct the applicable state,
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
county, or municipal governing body to suspend the business licenses or
permits of the business entity or employer for a period not less than sixty
(60) days and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days specific to the
location or locations where the unauthorized alien performed work;
(d) Before a business license or permit that has been suspended under
paragraph (c) of this subsection is reinstated, a legal representative of the
business entity or employer shall submit to the court a signed, sworn
affidavit stating that the business entity or employer is in compliance with
the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a copy of the
Memorandum of Understanding issued to the business entity or employer at
the time of enrollment in E-Verify; and
(e) A finding by a court of competent jurisdiction of a second violation of
subsection (2) of this section that does not occur within ten (10) years of a
first violation shall:
(a) Be considered a second violation of subsection (2) of this section by
the business entity or employer; and
(b) Be penalized in accordance with subsection (6) of this section.
(8) Upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction of a third violation of
subsection (2) of this section by a business entity or employer, including a
subcontractor, awarded a contract by the state, any political subdivision thereof,
or any state-funded entity:
(a) The business entity or employer shall be deemed in breach of contract and
the state, political subdivision thereof, or state-funded entity shall terminate
the contract after providing notice and an opportunity to be heard; and
(b) The court shall direct the applicable state, county, or municipal governing
bodies to permanently revoke all business licenses or permits of the business
entity or employer.
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
(9) This section shall not be construed to deny any procedural mechanisms or legal
defenses included in the E-Verify Program or any other federal work
authorization program.
(10) A business entity or employer that has enrolled in the E-Verify Program and has
used the program to verify the work authorization of an employee shall not be
liable under this section for violations resulting from the hiring of that employee.
(11) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section.
(12) Compliance with this section may be verified by the contracting authority or any
state or local law enforcement agency at any time to ensure a contractual
agreement as provided for in this section is being met.
(13) Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, this section shall not apply to
agreements by the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any state-funded
entity relating to debt obligations by such entities.
(14) Any business entity or employer found in violation of this section that has had its
business license or permit suspended shall not, for the duration of the
suspension, be allowed, directly or indirectly, to procure or execute a license or
permit similar to those that have been suspended.
(15) All contracts or agreements to which the state, a political subdivision, or state-
funded entity are a party shall include the following clause: "By signing this
contract, the contracting parties affirm, for the duration of the agreement, that
they will not violate federal immigration law or knowingly employ, hire for
employment, or continue to employ an unauthorized alien within the
Commonwealth of Kentucky. Furthermore, a contracting party found to be in
violation of this provision shall be deemed in breach of the agreement and shall
be responsible for all damages resulting therefrom."
(16) An action brought under this section shall be brought in Franklin Circuit Court.
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1270
Section 5. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed